Utah statutes.
73-4-7.   In case of use for power purposes.

If the water claimed to have been appropriated is used for developing power, the statement shall show, in addition to the facts required by Section 73-4-5, the number, size and kind of water wheels employed; the head under which each wheel is operated; the amount of power produced, and the purposes for which and the places where it is used; and the point where the water is returned to the natural stream or source.



No Change Since 1953

